District of Columbia statutes.
31-4447

Merger or consolidation — Approval by Mayor.

(a)

The plan of merger or of consolidation and the filings required by § 31-5803 shall be mailed to shareholders, to members, or to policyholders of the domestic merging and consolidating companies, and shall be filed with the Mayor according to § 31-5803 [repealed].

(b)

A life company aggrieved by the Mayor’s decision to disapprove a plan of merger or of consolidation with the Mayor under subsection (a) of this section shall have the rights, under § 31-5803 [repealed], to judicial review of the decision.

History

June 19, 1934, ch. 672, ch. III, § 46
as added Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-160, § 3(c), 32 DCR 39

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-644.

References in Text

Section 31-5803, referred to in (a) and (b), was repealed by § 17 of D.C. Law 10-44, effective Oct. 21, 1993.

Editor's Notes

Subsection (b) of this section is set forth above as it appears in D.C. Law 5-160. The word “filed” should probably appear following “consolidation.”.